Oklahoma, session 2025, SB78.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 151, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 13.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 13.1. Persons convicted of:
1. First degree murder as defined provided for in Section 701.7
of this title;
2. Second degree murder as defined by provided for in Section
701.8 of this title;
3. Manslaughter in the first degree as defined by provided for
in Section 711 of this title;
4. Poisoning with intent to kill as defined by provided for in
Section 651 of this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB78 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

5. Shooting with intent to kill, use of a vehicle to facilitate
use of a firearm, crossbow or other weapon, assault, battery, or
assault and battery with a deadly weapon or by other means likely to
produce death or great bodily harm, as provided for in Section 652
of this title;
6. Assault with intent to kill as provided for in Section 653
of this title;
7. Conjoint robbery as defined by provided for in Section 800
of this title;
8. Robbery with a dangerous weapon as defined provided for in
Section 801 of this title;
9. First degree robbery as defined provided for in Section 797
of this title;
10. First degree rape as provided for in Section 1111, or 1114
or 1115 of this title;
11. First degree arson as defined provided for in Section 1401
of this title;
12. First degree burglary as provided for in Section 1436 1431
of this title;
13. Bombing as defined provided for in Section 1767.1 of this
title;
14. Any crime against a child as provided for in Section 843.5
of this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB78 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

15. Forcible sodomy as defined provided for in Section 888 of
this title;
16. Child pornography sexual abuse material or aggravated child
pornography sexual abuse material as defined provided for in Section
1021.2, 1021.3, 1024.1, 1024.2, or 1040.12a of this title;
17. Child sex trafficking as defined in Section 1030 of this
title;
18. Lewd molestation of a child as defined provided for in
Section 1123 of this title;
19. Abuse of a vulnerable adult as defined in Section 10-103 of
Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Aggravated trafficking as provided for in subsection C of
Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Aggravated assault and battery as provided for in Section
646 of this title upon any person defending another person from
assault and battery; or
22. Human trafficking as provided for defined in Section 748 of
this title,
shall be required to serve not less than eighty-five percent (85%)
of any sentence of imprisonment imposed by the judicial system prior
to becoming eligible for consideration for parole. Persons
convicted of these offenses shall not be eligible for earned credits
or any other type of credits which have the effect of reducing the

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB78 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

leng th of the sentence to less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the
sentence imposed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 11, 2025 - DO PASS




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB78 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)